Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agent" means any person licensed by the department of revenue to purchase and affix adhesive or meter stamps on packages of cigarettes.

(2) "Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and irrespective of the tobacco being flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other ingredient, when the roll has a wrapper or cover made of paper or any material, except when the wrapper is wholly or in the greater part made of natural leaf tobacco in its natural state.

(3) "Manufacturer" means:

(a) Any entity that manufactures or otherwise produces cigarettes or causes cigarettes to be manufactured or produced anywhere that the manufacturer intends to be sold in this state, including cigarettes intended to be sold in the United States through an importer;

(b) The first purchaser anywhere that intends to resell in the United States cigarettes manufactured anywhere that the original manufacturer or maker does not intend to be sold in the United States; or

(c) Any entity that becomes a successor of an entity described in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(4) "Quality control and quality assurance program" means the laboratory procedures implemented to ensure that operator bias, systematic and nonsystematic methodological errors, and equipment-related problems do not affect the results of the testing. Such a program ensures that the testing repeatability remains within the required repeatability values stated in RCW 19.305.020(1)(f) for all test trials used to certify cigarettes in accordance with this chapter.

(5) "Repeatability" means the range of values within which the repeat results of cigarette test trials from a single laboratory will fall ninety-five percent of the time.

(6) "Retail dealer" means any person, other than a manufacturer or wholesale dealer, engaged in selling cigarettes or tobacco products.

(7) "Sale" or "sell" means any transfer of title of cigarettes for consideration, exchange, barter, gift, offer for sale, or distribution, in any manner or by any means.

(8) "Wholesale dealer" means any person who sells cigarettes or tobacco products to retail dealers or other persons for purposes of resale, and any person who owns, operates, or maintains one or more cigarette or tobacco product vending machines in, at, or upon premises owned or occupied by any other person.

[ 2008 c 239 s 1.]